Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1912.01
Appellate review; motion for new trial; when required.

(1) A motion for a new trial shall not be a prerequisite to obtaining appellate review of any issue upon which the ruling of the trial court appears in the record.

(2) When an action has been tried before a jury a motion for a new trial shall not be a prerequisite to obtaining appellate review of the sufficiency of the evidence, but a motion for a new trial shall be a prerequisite to obtaining appellate review of the issue of inadequate or excessive damages.

Laws 1982, LB 720, § 1.

This section does not modify our longstanding case law holding that an appellant assigning as error on appeal the denial of a motion for new trial does not properly raise as grounds for trial court error any grounds that were never assigned or argued to the trial court with respect to the motion. 132 Ventures v. Active Spine Physical Therapy, 318 Neb. 64, 13 N.W.3d 441 (2024).

Where a party has not made a motion for new trial in the trial court, but argues on appeal that there was insufficient evidence to support the amount of damages awarded at trial, an appellate court will review only the sufficiency of the evidence to support the jury's verdict. First Nat. Bank North Platte v. Cardenas, 299 Neb. 497, 909 N.W.2d 79 (2018).

In order for any question as to the admissibility of evidence to be reviewed on appeal under subsection (1) of this section, the record must show that the objection was brought to the attention of the trial judge and ruled upon. State v. Blair, 227 Neb. 742, 419 N.W.2d 868 (1988).

A motion for a new trial is not a prerequisite to obtain review in most cases, but the timely filing of such a motion will extend the time within which a notice of appeal must be filed to a period of thirty days following the overruling of that motion. In re Interest of C.M.H. and M.S.H., 227 Neb. 446, 418 N.W.2d 226 (1988).

A motion for new trial is not required to obtain appellate review of any issue upon which the ruling of the trial court appears in the record. State v. Wright, 220 Neb. 847, 374 N.W.2d 26 (1985).

The Supreme Court acquires jurisdiction of an equitable appeal when the notice of appeal and docket fee are filed within one month of the judgment. Caro, Inc. v. Roby, 215 Neb. 897, 342 N.W.2d 182 (1983).